Idaho statutes. Title 39 HEALTH AND SAFETY
Chapter 64
CLEAN LAKES ACT

Sec.

§ 39-6401. Legislative intent. [Repealed.]

Repealed by S.L. 2010, ch. 59, § 1, effective July 1, 2010.

§ 39-6402. Definitions. [Repealed.]

Repealed by S.L. 2010, ch. 59, § 1, effective July 1, 2010.

§ 39-6403. Declaration of policies and purposes. [Repealed.]

Repealed by S.L. 2010, ch. 59, § 1, effective July 1, 2010.

§ 39-6404. Establishment of a regional clean lakes coordinating council. [Repealed.]

Repealed by S.L. 2010, ch. 59, § 1, effective July 1, 2010.

§ 39-6405. Membership. [Repealed.]

Repealed by S.L. 2010, ch. 59, § 1, effective July 1, 2010.

§ 39-6406. Public advisory committee. [Repealed.]

Repealed by S.L. 2010, ch. 59, § 1, effective July 1, 2010.

§ 39-6407. Technical advisory group. [Repealed.]

Repealed by S.L. 2010, ch. 59, § 1, effective July 1, 2010.

§ 39-6408. Duties of the regional council. [Repealed.]

Repealed by S.L. 2010, ch. 59, § 1, effective July 1, 2010.

§ 39-6409. Responsibilities. [Repealed.]

Repealed by S.L. 2010, ch. 59, § 1, effective July 1, 2010.

§ 39-6410. Lake management plans. [Repealed.]

Repealed by S.L. 2010, ch. 59, § 1, effective July 1, 2010.

§ 39-6411. Moneys. [Repealed.]

Repealed by S.L. 2010, ch. 59, § 1, effective July 1, 2010.

§ 39-6412. Organization. [Repealed.]

Repealed by S.L. 2010, ch. 59, § 1, effective July 1, 2010.

§ 39-6413. Quorum. [Repealed.]

Repealed by S.L. 2010, ch. 59, § 1, effective July 1, 2010.